Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7132.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-23-2 and 11-23-2.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-23 entitled
"Homicide" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-23-2. Penalties for murder.
Every person guilty of murder in the first degree shall be imprisoned for life. Every person
guilty of murder in the first degree: (1) committed intentionally while engaged in the commission
of another capital offense or other felony for which life imprisonment may be imposed; (2)
committed in a manner creating a great risk of death to more than one person by means of a weapon
or device or substance which would normally be hazardous to the life of more than one person; (3)
committed at the direction of another person in return for money or any other thing of monetary
value from that person; (4) committed in a manner involving torture or an aggravated battery to the
victim; (5) committed against any member of the judiciary, law enforcement officer, corrections
employee, assistant attorney general or special assistant attorney general, or firefighter arising from
the lawful performance of his or her official duties; (6) committed by a person who at the time of
the murder was committed to confinement in the adult correctional institutions or the state
reformatory for women upon conviction of a felony; or (7) committed during the course of the
perpetration or attempted perpetration of felony manufacture, sale, delivery or other distribution of
a controlled substance otherwise prohibited by the provisions of chapter 28 of title 21; shall be
imprisoned for life and if ordered by the court pursuant to chapter 19.2 of title 12 that person shall
not be eligible for parole from imprisonment; provided that, no person twenty-one (21) years of

age or younger shall be imprisoned without the possibility of parole. Every person guilty of murder
in the second degree shall be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) years and may be imprisoned for
life.
11-23-2.1. Penalty for murder of a kidnapped person under the age of eighteen (18).
If any person under the age of eighteen (18) who is kidnapped in violation of § 11-26-1 by
a person other than his or her natural or adopted parent dies as a direct result of the kidnapping,
then the person convicted of the offense shall be guilty of murder in the first degree and shall be
punished by imprisonment for life, and the court may, pursuant to chapter 19.2 of title 12, order
that that person not be eligible for parole, provided, that no person twenty-one (21) years of age or
younger shall be imprisoned without the possibility of parole.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003664
========
LC003664 - Page 2 of 3